Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1168YH (3) 91 sc/js H.F. 750 Section 1. Section 29A.28, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. All officers and employees of the state, a 3 subdivision thereof, or a municipality, other than employees 4 employed temporarily for six months or less, who are members of 5 the national guard, organized reserves or any component part of 6 the military, naval, air, or space forces, or nurse corps of 7 this state or nation, or who are or may be otherwise inducted 8 into the military service of this state or of the United 9 States, or who are members of the civil air patrol, or who are 10 regular, reserve, or auxiliary members of the United States 11 coast guard , shall, when ordered by proper authority to state 12 active duty, national guard duty, or federal active duty, or 13 when performing a civil air patrol mission pursuant to section 14 29A.3A , be entitled to a leave of absence from such civil 15 employment for the period of state active duty, national guard 16 duty, federal active duty, or civil air patrol duty and the 17 time spent traveling to perform, and returning from performing, 18 the military duty without loss of status or efficiency rating, 19 and without loss of pay during the first thirty days of such 20 leave of absence. 21 b. Where When state active duty, national guard duty, 22 federal active duty, or civil air patrol duty , including 23 the time spent traveling to perform, and returning from 24 performing, the military duty, is for a period of less than 25 thirty days, a leave of absence under this section shall only 26 be required for those days that the civil employee would 27 normally perform services for the state, subdivision of the 28 state, or a municipality. The provisions of this section shall 29 also apply to a leave of absence by a member of the national 30 disaster medical system of the United States when activated for 31 federal service with the system. If the workday for a civil 32 employee encompasses a continuous period of up to twenty-four 33 consecutive hours, regardless of whether the workday extends 34 into one or two calendar days, the civil employee shall only 35 -1- LSB 1168YH (3) 91 sc/js 1/ 2 H.F. 750 be required to take a leave of absence for one day for that 1 workday if a leave of absence is required under this paragraph. 2 c. A civil employee may use a leave of absence for inactive 3 duty training and travel to and from such training. The leave 4 of absence under this paragraph shall only apply to those hours 5 that the civil employee would normally perform services for the 6 state, subdivision of the state, or a municipality. 7